Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2114
Marriage and family therapy, defined.

Marriage and family therapy means the assessment and treatment of mental and emotional disorders, whether cognitive, affective, or behavioral, within the context of marriage and family systems through the professional application of psychotherapeutic and family systems theories and techniques in the delivery of services to individuals, couples, and families for the purpose of treating such disorders.

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 25;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,306;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 732.